Illinois, session 104th, HB3747.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 10-510 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/10-510)7    Sec. 10-510. Assessment of wooded acreage. 8    (a) If wooded acreage was classified as farmland during 9the 2006 assessment year, then the property shall be assessed 10by multiplying the current fair cash value of the property by 11the transition percentage. The chief county assessment officer 12shall determine the transition percentage for the property by 13dividing (i) the property's 2006 equalized assessed value as 14farmland by (ii) the 2006 fair cash value of the property. 15Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection (a), 16beginning with the 2025 assessment year and continuing through 17the earlier of the 2039 assessment year or the first year in 18which the property no longer qualifies for assessment under 19this Section, the assessed value of property that is subject 20to assessment under this Section may not exceed the product of 21the assessed value of the property for the immediately 22preceding assessment year multiplied by 104%. 23    (b) The wooded acreage shall continue to be assessed under   HB3747- 2 -LRB104 06278 HLH 16313 b1the provisions of this Section through any assessment year in 2which the property is transferred or no longer qualifies as 3wooded acreage under Section 10-505, and the property must be 4assessed as otherwise permitted by law beginning the following 5assessment year. For purposes of this Section, a transfer 6between spouses does not disqualify the property from the 7preferential assessment treatment under this Division for 8wooded acreage. 9(Source: P.A. 100-834, eff. 1-1-19.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.